Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.077

State treasurer is custodian of funds.

The state treasurer is the custodian of, and accountant for, all funds and holdings of the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030.

[ 1991 c 35 s 109.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.